siciliano.lexc
LEXICON SufVerbAri

    +V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ari #;
    !-- Needs SufClit to be done first!
!    +V_NOFIN+INF+PRES:+INF+PRES*ar SufClit;

    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+SING:+IND+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+SING:+IND+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+SING:+IND+PRES+3+SING*a #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+1+PLUR:+IND+PRES+1+PLUR*amu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+2+PLUR:+IND+PRES+2+PLUR*ati #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*anu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PRES+3+PLUR:+IND+PRES+3+PLUR*unu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*ava #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+SING:+IND+IMPERF+1+SING*avu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+SING:+IND+IMPERF+2+SING*avi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+SING:+IND+IMPERF+3+SING*ava #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*àvamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+1+PLUR*avamu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*àvavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+2+PLUR*avavu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*avanu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*àvanu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*avunu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+IND+IMPERF+3+PLUR*àvunu #;

    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*ai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*avi #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*aiu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+SING:+IND+PAST+1+SING*avu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+SING:+IND+PAST+2+SING*asti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*au #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+SING:+IND+PAST+3+SING*ò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*ammu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+1+PLUR:+IND+PAST+1+PLUR*amu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astivu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+2+PLUR:+IND+PAST+2+PLUR*astu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*arunu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+PAST+3+PLUR:+IND+PAST+3+PLUR*aru #;

    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+SING:+IND+FUT+1+SING*irò #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+SING:+IND+FUT+2+SING*irai #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+SING:+IND+FUT+3+SING*irà #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+1+PLUR:+IND+FUT+1+PLUR*iremu #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+2+PLUR:+IND+FUT+2+PLUR*iriti #;
    +V_FIN+IND+FUT+3+PLUR:+IND+FUT+3+PLUR*irannu #;

    ! NOTE: subjunctive present is not used,
    ! indicative present used instead
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+1+SING*u #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+2+SING*i #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING:+SUBJ+PRES+3+SING*a #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+1+PLUR*amu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+2+PLUR*ati #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+PRES+3+PLUR*anu #;

    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+SING*assi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+SING*assi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+SING*assi #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+1+PLUR*assimu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+2+PLUR*assivu #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*assiru #;
    +V_FIN+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR:+SUBJ+IMPERF+3+PLUR*assinu #;

    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+SING:+COND+PRES+1+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+SING:+COND+PRES+2+SING*irissi #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+SING:+COND+PRES+3+SING*iria #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+1+PLUR:+COND+PRES+1+PLUR*iriamu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+2+PLUR:+COND+PRES+2+PLUR*iriavu #;
    +V_FIN+COND+PRES+3+PLUR:+COND+PRES+3+PLUR*irianu #;

    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+SING:+IMP+PRES+2+SING*a #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+SING:+IMP+PRES+3+SING*assi #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+1+PLUR*amu #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+2+PLUR*ati #;
    +V_FIN+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR:+IMP+PRES+3+PLUR*assiru #;

    !--- unfinished italian forms             ---
    !+V_PP+PART+PRES+SING:+PART+PRES+SING*ante #;
    !+V_PP+PART+PRES+PLUR:+PART+PRES+PLUR*anti #;
    !---                                      ---

    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+SING:+PART+PAST+MASC+SING*atu #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING:+PART+PAST+FEMM+SING*ata #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR:+PART+PAST+MASC+PLUR*ati #;
    +V_PP+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR:+PART+PAST+FEMM+PLUR*ate #;

    +V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*annu #;
    !--- Needs SufClit to be done first!
    !+V_NOFIN+GER+PRES:+GER+PRES*annu SufClit;

LEXICON Root
    l_abbruciari:abbruci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_accatari:accat+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_addumannari:addumann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_allavancari:allavanc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_ammazzari:ammazz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_arraspari:arrasp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_avanzari:avanz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_brillari:brill+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_cacari:cac+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_cacciari:cacci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_campari:camp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_cantari:cant+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_castigari:castig+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_chiamari:chiam+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_chiantari:chiant+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_cumannari:cumann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_cunnannari:cunnann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_dummannari:dummann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_guardagnari:guardagn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_guardari:guard+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_imparari:impar+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_ingarzari:ingarz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_lassari:lass+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_lavari:lav+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_manciari:manci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_mparari:mpar+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_ngarzari:ngarz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_pagari:pag+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_parlari:parl+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_parrari:parr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_passari:pass+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_pisciari:pisci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_purtari:purt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_raccumannari:raccumann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_scanciari:scanci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_scanzari:scanz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_sfragari:sfrag+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_sparagnari:sparagn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_sparrari:sparr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_stuiari:stui+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_tastari:tast+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
    l_viaggiari:viaggi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abbastari:abbast+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abbisugnari:abbisugn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abbitari:abbit+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abbruciari:abbruci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abbusari:abbus+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_abitari:abit+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accattari:accatt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_acchianari:acchian+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accittari:accitt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accuminciari:accuminci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accuminzari:accuminz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accumpagnari:accumpagn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accupari:accup+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_accusari:accus+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_addimurari:addimur+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_addisiari:addisi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_addivintari:addivint+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_addumannari:addumann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_addumari:addum+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_affidari:affid+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_affirmari:affirm+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_agghicari:agghic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_aiutari:aiut+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ajutari:ajut+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_alluggiari:alluggi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_amari:am+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammazzari:ammazz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_amminazzari:amminazz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_amministrari:amministr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammirari:ammir+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammucciari:ammucci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammuntari:ammunt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammustrari:ammustr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ammuttari:ammutt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_annari:ann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_annunzari:annunz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_annunziari:annunzi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_applicari:applic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_appruvari:appruv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arricurdari:arricurd+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arriguardari:arriguard+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arrijalari:arrijal+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arripigghiari:arripigghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arristari:arrist+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arrivari:arriv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arrubbari:arrubb+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_arruvari:arruv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ascutari:ascut+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_aspittari:aspitt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_assicutari:assicut+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_assignari:assign+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_assimpicari:assimpic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_assuppari:assupp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_attaccari:attacc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_attravirsari:attravirs+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_attruvari:attruv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_aumintari:aumint+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ballari:ball+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_bisugnari:bisugn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_buscari:busc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cacciari:cacci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_calari:cal+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_caminari:camin+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_canciari:canci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cantari:cant+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cascari:casc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_castiari:casti+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_celebrari:celebr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cercari:cerc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_chiamari:chiam+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_circari:circ+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_circulari:circul+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_circunnari:circunn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_criari:cri+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cugghiuniari:cugghiuni+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_culligari:cullig+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cuminzari:cuminz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cumunicari:cumunic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cunfaffari:cunfaff+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cunfissari:cunfiss+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cunsigghiari:cunsigghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cuntintari:cuntint+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cuntrastari:cuntrast+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cunzidirari:cunzidir+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_curtivari:curtiv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_cuvirnari:cuvirn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_dirivari:diriv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_dumannari:dumann+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_esitari:esit+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_figghiari:figghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_firriari:firri+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_friscari:frisc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_furiari:furi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_furzari:furz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_giurari:giur+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_guadagnari:guadagn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_innicari:innic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_jucari:juc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_lavari:lav+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ligari:lig+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_livari:liv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_manciari:manci+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_manifistari:manifist+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_minari:min+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_misurari:misur+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_mparari:mpar+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_mudificari:mudific+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_mustrari:mustr+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nari:n+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nchiuvari:nchiuv+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ncucchiari:ncucchi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nivicari:nivic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nsignari:nsign+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ntuppari:ntupp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nvintari:nvint+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_nzignari:nzign+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_pajari:paj+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_participari:particip+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_pigghiari:pigghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_pinzari:pinz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_praticari:pratic+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_priparari:pripar+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_prununzari:prununz+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_pruvucari:pruvuc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_rapprisintari:rapprisint+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ricitari:ricit+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_rifiutari:rifiut+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_riguardari:riguard+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ringraziari:ringrazi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_ristari:rist+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_riturnari:riturn+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_sanari:san+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_sbagghiari:sbagghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_scantari:scant+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_scavari:scav+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_scutulari:scutul+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_signari:sign+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_siminari:simin+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_sparari:spar+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_spicificari:spicific+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_spiegari:spieg+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_spittari:spitt+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_stimulari:stimul+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_studiari:studi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_sunari:sun+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_sviluppari:svilupp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_tastari:tast+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_tirari:tir+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_trasfurmari:trasfurm+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_travagghiari:travagghi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_trimari:trim+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_tuccari:tucc+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_urdinari:urdin+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_usari:us+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_vantari:vant+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_viaggiari:viaggi+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_visitari:visit+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
   l_zappari:zapp+V_ARI SufVerbAri;
